Hawaii statutes.
[§98-8] Public access to legal material in
official electronic record. An official publisher of legal material in an
electronic record that is required to be preserved under section 98-7 shall
ensure that the material is reasonably available for use by the public on a
permanent basis. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next